Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-492
Impersonating officer; penalty.

Any unauthorized person impersonating an officer under color of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1929, c. 148, § 9, p. 517;

C.S.1929, § 60-409;

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 19, p. 516;

Laws 1941, c. 176, § 2, p. 689;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-409;

R.S.1943, § 60-414;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 78;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-414;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 42.